apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<pardef n="/z.omamuldo__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamalde</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>els:omaldy</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamalde</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamalde</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamaldey</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamaldey</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>els.omaldy</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldoy</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>z.omamuldoy</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyloldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyloldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyloldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyloldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eiloldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eiloldo</l> 
        <r>z.omamuldo<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>


<pardef n="/s:tm.émamupeb__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamupeb</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamupeb</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamupeb</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamupeb</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamupeb</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamupeb</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamupeb</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:omamullob</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:omamullob</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamapob</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamapob</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>tm.s:émamapob</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tm.s:émamapob</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamupeb</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamupercye</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:omamullob</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:omamullob</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamupeb</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:tm.émamupercye</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:épeyb</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:épeyry</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:épeyb</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:épeyry</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eils:épeib</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eils:épeiry</l> 
        <r>s:tm.émamupeb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="s:tm.émamupeb"><par n="/s:tm.émamupeb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="z.omamuldo"><par n="/z.omamuldo__vblex"/></e>
